Maine, session 132, LD254.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §150-V is enacted to read:
§150-V. Pancreatic Cancer Awareness Month
The month of November of each year is designated as Pancreatic Cancer Awareness
Month, and the Governor shall issue annually a proclamation inviting and urging the people
of the State to observe the month through appropriate activities.
Page 1 - 132LR0744(03)